Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5683.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 37-14.1-6 of the General Laws in Chapter 37-14.1 entitled "Minority
Business Enterprise" is hereby amended to read as follows:
37-14.1-6. Minority business enterprise participation.
(a) Minority business enterprises shall be included in all procurements and construction
projects under this chapter and shall be awarded a minimum of fifteen percent (15%) twenty percent
(20%) of the dollar value of the entire procurement or project. Of that fifteen percent (15%),
minority business enterprises owned and controlled by a minority owner, as defined in § 37-14.1-
3, shall be awarded a minimum of seven and one-half percent (7.5%), and minority business
enterprises owned and controlled by a woman shall be awarded a minimum of seven and one-half
percent (7.5%). Annually, by October 1, the department of administration shall submit a report to
the general assembly on the status of achieving the aforementioned participation requirements in
the most recent fiscal year. Of that twenty percent (20%), minority business enterprises owned and
controlled by a minority owner, as defined in § 37-14.1-3, shall be awarded a minimum of ten
percent (10%), and minority business enterprises owned and controlled by a woman shall also be
awarded a minimum of ten percent (10%). The director of the department of administration is
further authorized to establish by rules and regulation the certification process and formulas for
giving minority business enterprises a preference in contract and subcontract awards.
(b) Any minority business enterprise currently certified by the U.S. Small Business

Administration as an 8(a) firm governed by 13 C.F.R. part 124 shall be deemed to be certified by
the department of administration as a minority business enterprise and shall only be required to
submit evidence of federal certification of good standing.
(c) The provisions of this chapter shall not be waived, including, but not limited to, during
a declared state of emergency.
(d) The state of Rhode Island will arrange for a disparity study to evaluate the need for the
development of programs to enhance the participation in state contracts of business enterprises
owned by women and minorities, to be repeated every five (5) years, beginning in fiscal year 2025.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001254
========
LC001254 - Page 2 of 3